src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE
+Abl000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>tól@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Abl000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>től@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ade000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>nál@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ade000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>nél@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+All000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>hoz@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+All000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>h%^Ö2z@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Cau:%>ért NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Dat000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>nak@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Dat000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>nek@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Del000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ról@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Del000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ről@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ela000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ból@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ela000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ből@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/F:%>ként NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/M00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ul@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/M00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ül@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ill00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ba@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ill00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>be@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ine000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ban@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ine000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ben@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ins000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>%^V2al@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ins000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^V2el@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Nom: NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ses00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>on@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ses00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2n@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Sla00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ra@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Sla00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>re@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ter:%>ig NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Tra00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>%^V2á@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Tra00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^V2é@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON NOUN_PX-OR-NOT
@R.PX@ NOUN_PX ;
@D.PX@ # ;

LEXICON	 NOUN_PX
+PxSg1@U.PX.SG1@:0@U.PX.SG1@ # ;
+PxSg2@U.PX.SG2@:0@U.PX.SG2@ # ;
+PxSg3@U.PX.SG3@:0@U.PX.SG3@ # ;
+PxPl1@U.PX.PL1@:0@U.PX.PL1@ # ;
+PxPl2@U.PX.PL2@:0@U.PX.PL2@ # ;
+PxPl3@U.PX.PL3@:0@U.PX.PL3@ # ;


LEXICON Cases

+N+Sg+Nom:0     #   ;
+N+Sg+Acc:t    #   ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ben    #   ;

#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
